ja: ビーズタイプ: アクリル/プラスチックビーズ; ミックス/アソートビーズ; ビューグルビーズ; カボション; チャーム (ビーズ用); クリスタルビーズ (例:; シリンダーシードビーズ (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); チェコガラスビーズ; 天然石ビーズ; アルファベット/数字ビーズ; メタルビーズ; パール (ガラスまたは人工); シードビーズ (ラウンド); SuperDuo/Tila); 2 ホールビーズ (例:; ウッドビーズ; バイコーン/ラウンド); その他
cs: Typ korálku: Akrylové/plastové korálky; Směsi korálků / různé; Čípky; Kabošony; Přívěsky (používané s korálky); Křišťálové korálky (např.; Válcový rokajl (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); České skleněné korálky; Korálky z drahých kamenů; Korálky s písmeny/čísly; Kovové korálky; Perly (skleněné nebo syntetické); Rokajl (kulatý); SuperDuo/Tila); Dvoudírkové korálky (např.; Dřevěné korálky; bikónické/kulaté); Jiné
fi: Helmen tyyppi: Akryyli-/muovihelmet; Helmisekoitukset/lajitelmat; Putkihelmet; Cabochonit; Riipukset (käytetään helmien kanssa); Kristallihelmet (esim.; Lieriömäiset siemenhelmet (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); Tšekkiläiset lasihelmet; Jalokivihelmet; Kirjain-/numerohelmet; Metallihelmet; Helmihelmet (lasi tai synteettinen); Siemenhelmet (pyöreät); SuperDuo/Tila); Kaksireikäiset helmet (esim.; Puuhelmet; bicone/pyöreä); Muu
fr: Type de perles: Perles en acrylique/plastique; Mélanges/assortiments de perles; Perles tubes; Cabochons; Breloques (utilisées avec des perles); Perles en cristal (par ex.; Perles de rocaille cylindriques (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); Perles en verre de Bohême; Perles en pierres précieuses; Perles lettres/chiffres; Perles en métal; Perles (en verre ou synthétiques); Perles de rocaille (rondes); SuperDuo/Tila); Perles à deux trous (par ex.; Perles en bois; bicone/rond); Autre
ko: 비드 유형: 아크릴/플라스틱 비즈; 혼합/어소트 비즈; 뷰글 비즈; 카보숑; 참(비즈와 함께 사용); 크리스탈 비즈(예:; 실린더 시드 비즈(델리카/트레져/토호 아이코); 체코 유리 비즈; 젬스톤 비즈; 알파벳/숫자 비즈; 금속 비즈; 진주(유리 또는 합성); 시드 비즈(원형); 슈퍼듀오/틸라); 2홀 비즈(예:; 우드 비즈; 바이콘/원형); 기타
en: Bead type: Acrylic/plastic beads; Bead mixes/assorted; Bugle beads; Cabochons; Charms (used with beads); Crystal beads (e.g.; Cylinder seed beads (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); Czech glass beads; Gemstone beads; Letter/number beads; Metal beads; Pearls (glass or synthetic); Seed beads (round); SuperDuo/Tila); Two-hole beads (e.g.; Wood beads; bicone/round); Other
th: ประเภทลูกปัด: ลูกปัดอะคริลิก/พลาสติก; ลูกปัดคละแบบ; ลูกปัดปล้องอ้อย; หลังเบี้ย; จี้ชาร์ม (ใช้กับลูกปัด); ลูกปัดคริสตัล (เช่น; ลูกปัดเม็ดทรายทรงกระบอก (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); ลูกปัดแก้วเช็ก; ลูกปัดหินสี; ลูกปัดตัวอักษร/ตัวเลข; ลูกปัดโลหะ; ไข่มุก (แก้วหรือสังเคราะห์); ลูกปัดเม็ดทราย (กลม); SuperDuo/Tila); ลูกปัดสองรู (เช่น; ลูกปัดไม้; ทรงกรวยคู่/กลม); อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Вид мъниста: Акрилни/пластмасови мъниста; Смесени/различни мъниста; Мъниста тип пръчица; Кабошони; Талисмани (използвани с мъниста); Кристални мъниста (напр.; Цилиндрични дребни мъниста (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); Чешки стъклени мъниста; Мъниста от скъпоценни камъни; Мъниста с букви/цифри; Метални мъниста; Перли (стъклени или синтетични); Дребни мъниста (кръгли); SuperDuo/Tila); Мъниста с две дупки (напр.; Дървени мъниста; биконични/кръгли); Друго
sv: Pärltyp: Akryl-/plastpärlor; Pärlmixar/blandat; Stavpärlor; Cabochoner; Berlocker (används med pärlor); Kristallpärlor (t.ex.; Cylindriska rocaillepärlor (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); Tjeckiska glaspärlor; Ädelstenspärlor; Bokstavs-/sifferpärlor; Metallpärlor; Pärlor (glas eller syntetiska); Rocaillepärlor (runda); SuperDuo/Tila); Tvåhålspärlor (t.ex.; Träpärlor; bikon/runda); Övrigt
pl: Typ koralika: Koraliki akrylowe/plastikowe; Mieszanki koralików/różne; Koraliki rurkowe; Kaboszony; Zawieszki (używane z koralikami); Koraliki kryształowe (np.; Koraliki cylindryczne (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); Czeskie koraliki szklane; Koraliki z kamieni szlachetnych; Koraliki litery/cyfry; Koraliki metalowe; Perły (szklane lub syntetyczne); Koraliki drobne (okrągłe); SuperDuo/Tila); Koraliki dwudziurkowe (np.; Koraliki drewniane; dwustożkowe/okrągłe); Inne
sk-SK: Typ korálok: Akrylové/plastové korálky; Zmesi korálok/rôzne; Rúrkové korálky; Kabošony; Prívesky (používané s korálkami); Kryštálové korálky (napr.; Valcové rokajlové korálky (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); České sklenené korálky; Korálky z drahých kameňov; Korálky s písmenami/číslami; Kovové korálky; Perly (sklenené alebo syntetické); Rokajlové korálky (okrúhle); SuperDuo/Tila); Dvojdierkové korálky (napr.; Drevené korálky; dvojkónické/okrúhle); Iné
pt-BR: Tipo de conta: Miçangas acrílicas/plásticas; Miçangas mistas/variadas; Miçangas canutilho; Cabochões; Berloques (usados com miçangas); Miçangas de cristal (ex.; Miçangas cilíndricas (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); Miçangas de vidro tcheco; Miçangas de pedras preciosas; Miçangas de letras/números; Miçangas de metal; Pérolas (vidro ou sintéticas); Miçangas de semente (redondas); SuperDuo/Tila); Miçangas de dois furos (ex.; Miçangas de madeira; bicone/redondo); Outros
el: Τύπος χάντρας: Ακρυλικές/πλαστικές χάντρες; Μείγματα χαντρών/διάφορες; Σωληνωτές χάντρες (bugle); Καμποσόν; Σύμβολα charms (για χρήση με χάντρες); Κρυστάλλινες χάντρες (π.χ.; Κυλινδρικές χάντρες σποράς (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); Τσεχικές γυάλινες χάντρες; Χάντρες από πολύτιμους λίθους; Χάντρες με γράμματα/αριθμούς; Μεταλλικές χάντρες; Μαργαριτάρια (γυάλινα ή συνθετικά); Χάντρες σποράς (στρογγυλές); SuperDuo/Tila); Χάντρες με δύο οπές (π.χ.; Ξύλινες χάντρες; δίκωνες/στρογγυλές); Άλλο
vi: Loại hạt: Hạt cườm acrylic/nhựa; Hạt cườm hỗn hợp/đủ loại; Hạt cườm ống; Hạt cabochon; Phụ kiện charm (dùng với hạt cườm); Hạt pha lê (ví dụ:; Hạt cườm trụ (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); Hạt cườm thủy tinh Séc; Hạt đá quý; Hạt cườm chữ/số; Hạt cườm kim loại; Hạt ngọc trai (thủy tinh hoặc nhân tạo); Hạt cườm tròn (seed bead); SuperDuo/Tila); Hạt cườm hai lỗ (ví dụ:; Hạt cườm gỗ; hình nón đôi/tròn); Khác
nb: Perletype: Akryl-/plastperler; Perleblandinger/assortert; Stavperler; Cabochoner; Anheng (brukt med perler); Krystallperler (f.eks.; Sylinder-seed-perler (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); Tsjekkiske glassperler; Edelstensperler; Bokstav-/tallperler; Metallperler; Perler (glass eller syntetisk); Seed-perler (runde); SuperDuo/Tila); Tohullsperler (f.eks.; Treperler; bikoniske/runde); Annet
hr-HR: Vrsta perle: Akrilne/plastične perle; Mješavine perli / raznovrsno; Cjevaste perle; Kabošoni; Privjesci (koriste se s perlama); Kristalne perle (npr.; Cilindrične sitne perle (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); Češke staklene perle; Perle od dragog kamenja; Perle sa slovima/brojevima; Metalne perle; Biseri (stakleni ili sintetički); Sitne perle (okrugle); SuperDuo/Tila); Perle s dvije rupe (npr.; Drvene perle; bikonusne/okrugle); Ostalo
ro-RO: Tip de mărgele: Mărgele din acril/plastic; Mixuri de mărgele / asortate; Mărgele tubulare; Caboșoane; Talismane (utilizate cu mărgele); Mărgele de cristal (de ex.; Mărgele de nisip cilindrice (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); Mărgele din sticlă de Cehia; Mărgele din pietre prețioase; Mărgele cu litere/cifre; Mărgele metalice; Perle (sticlă sau sintetice); Mărgele de nisip (rotunde); SuperDuo/Tila); Mărgele cu două găuri (de ex.; Mărgele din lemn; biconice/rotunde); Altele
da: Perletype: Akryl-/plastikperler; Perleblandinger/assorterede; Stavperler; Cabochoner; Charms (bruges med perler); Krystalperler (f.eks.; Cylinder-rocailles (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); Tjekkiske glasperler; Ædelstensperler; Bogstav-/talperler; Metalperler; Perler (glas eller syntetiske); Rocailles-perler (runde); SuperDuo/Tila); Perler med to huller (f.eks.; Træperler; bicone/rund); Andet
it: Tipo di perlina: Perline in acrilico/plastica; Mix di perline/assortite; Perline bugle; Cabochon; Ciondoli (usati con perline); Perline in cristallo (es.; Perline di conteria cilindriche (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); Perline in vetro ceco; Perline di pietre preziose; Perline con lettere/numeri; Perline in metallo; Perle (vetro o sintetiche); Perline di conteria (tonde); SuperDuo/Tila); Perline a due fori (es.; Perline in legno; bicono/tonde); Altro
es: Tipo de cuenta: Cuentas de acrílico/plástico; Mezclas de cuentas/surtidas; Cuentas de canutillo; Cabujones; Dijes (usados con cuentas); Cuentas de cristal (p. ej.,; Mostacillas cilíndricas (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); Cuentas de vidrio checo; Cuentas de piedras preciosas; Cuentas de letras/números; Cuentas de metal; Perlas (de vidrio o sintéticas); Mostacillas (redondas); SuperDuo/Tila); Cuentas de dos orificios (p. ej.,; Cuentas de madera; bicono/redondas); Otro
pt-PT: Tipo de conta: Contas de acrílico/plástico; Mistura de contas/sortido; Contas canutilho; Cabochões; Berloques (utilizados com contas); Contas de cristal (p. ex.,; Missangas cilíndricas (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); Contas de vidro checo; Contas de pedras preciosas; Contas com letras/números; Contas de metal; Pérolas (vidro ou sintéticas); Missangas (redondas); SuperDuo/Tila); Contas de dois furos (p. ex.,; Contas de madeira; bicone/redonda); Outro
hu: Gyöngy típusa: Akril/műanyag gyöngyök; Gyöngykeverékek/válogatások; Szalmagyöngyök; Kabosonok; Függők (gyöngyökhöz használva); Kristálygyöngyök (pl.; Henger alakú kásagyöngyök (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); Cseh üveggyöngyök; Drágakőgyöngyök; Betű-/számgyöngyök; Fémgyöngyök; Gyöngyök (üveg vagy szintetikus); Kásagyöngyök (kerek); SuperDuo/Tila); Kétlyukú gyöngyök (pl.; Fagyöngyök; bikónus/kerek); Egyéb
tr: Boncuk tipi: Akrilik/plastik boncuklar; Boncuk karışımları/çeşitli; Boru boncuklar; Kabaşonlar; Süsler (boncuklarla kullanılan); Kristal boncuklar (örn.; Silindir kum boncuklar (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); Çek cam boncuklar; Doğal taş boncuklar; Harf/rakam boncuklar; Metal boncuklar; İnciler (cam veya sentetik); Kum boncuklar (yuvarlak); SuperDuo/Tila); İki delikli boncuklar (örn.; Ahşap boncuklar; bikonik/yuvarlak); Diğer
de: Perlenart: Acryl-/Kunststoffperlen; Perlenmischungen/sortiert; Stiftperlen; Cabochons; Charms (zur Verwendung mit Perlen); Kristallperlen (z. B.; Zylinder-Rocailles (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); Tschechische Glasperlen; Edelsteinperlen; Buchstaben-/Zahlenperlen; Metallperlen; Perlen (Glas oder synthetisch); Rocailles (rund); SuperDuo/Tila); Zweilochperlen (z. B.; Holzperlen; Doppelkegel/rund); Sonstige
sl-SI: Vrsta perlic: Akrilne/plastične perle; Mešanice perl/različne perle; Cevaste perle (bugle); Kabošoni; Obeski (za uporabo s perlami); Kristalne perle (npr.; Cilindrične drobne perle (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); Češke steklene perle; Perle iz dragih kamnov; Perle s črkami/številkami; Kovinske perle; Biseri (stekleni ali sintetični); Drobne perle (okrogle); SuperDuo/Tila); Perle z dvema luknjama (npr.; Lesene perle; bikonus/okrogle); Drugo
nl: Kraaltype: Acryl/plastic kralen; Kralenmixen/gesorteerd; Pijpkralen; Cabochons; Bedels (gebruikt met kralen); Kristallen kralen (bijv.; Cilinder rocailles (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); Tsjechische glaskralen; Edelsteenkralen; Letter-/cijferkralen; Metalen kralen; Parels (glas of synthetisch); Rocailles (rond); SuperDuo/Tila); Kralen met twee rijggaten (bijv.; Houten kralen; bicone/rond); Overig
ru: Тип бисера: Акриловые/пластиковые бусины; Микс/ассорти бусин; Стеклярус; Кабошоны; Шармы (для использования с бусинами); Хрустальные бусины (напр.,; Цилиндрический бисер (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); Чешские стеклянные бусины; Бусины из натуральных камней; Бусины с буквами/цифрами; Металлические бусины; Жемчуг (стеклянный или искусственный); Круглый бисер; SuperDuo/Tila); Бусины с двумя отверстиями (напр.,; Деревянные бусины; биконус/круглые); Другое
zh-TW: 珠子類型: 壓克力/塑膠串珠; 混合/綜合串珠; 管珠; 蛋面寶石; 吊飾 (與串珠搭配使用); 水晶串珠 (例如：; 圓柱型種子珠 (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); 捷克玻璃珠; 天然石/寶石串珠; 字母/數字串珠; 金屬串珠; 珍珠 (玻璃或合成); 種子珠 (圓形); SuperDuo/Tila); 雙孔串珠 (例如：; 木珠; 雙錐/圓形); 其他
lt-LT: Karoliukų tipas: Akriliniai / plastikiniai karoliukai; Karoliukų mišiniai / asorti; Cilindriniai karoliukai (bugle); Kabašonai; Pakabukai (naudojami su karoliukais); Krištoliniai karoliukai (pvz.; Cilindriniai smulkūs karoliukai („Delica“ / „Treasure“ / „Toho Aiko“); Čekiško stiklo karoliukai; Brangakmenių karoliukai; Karoliukai su raidėmis / skaičiais; Metaliniai karoliukai; Perlai (stikliniai arba sintetiniai); Smulkūs karoliukai (apvalūs); „SuperDuo“ / „Tila“); Dviejų angų karoliukai (pvz.; Mediniai karoliukai; dvikūgiai / apvalūs); Kita
zh-CN: 珠子类型: 亚克力/塑料珠; 混合/什锦珠; 玻璃管珠; 凸圆形宝石; 吊坠（与珠子搭配使用）; 水晶珠（如：; 圆柱形米珠 (Delica/Treasure/Toho Aiko); 捷克玻璃珠; 宝石珠; 字母/数字珠; 金属珠; 珍珠（玻璃或人造）; 米珠（圆形）; SuperDuo/Tila）; 双孔珠（如：; 木珠; 双锥形/圆形）; 其他